Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-1704.02
Sheriff; appoint employee.

Except when otherwise provided specifically by law for substitute service by a deputy, a sheriff may appoint an employee of his or her department to serve any summons or writ, by endorsement thereon substantially as follows: "I hereby appoint ........ to serve the within writ;" which shall be dated and signed by the sheriff.

Laws 1879, § 125, p. 386;

R.S.1913, § 5739;

C.S.1922, § 5068;

C.S.1929, § 84-805;

R.S.1943, (1981), § 84-805;

Laws 1987, LB 223, § 2.

Authority is conferred upon a sheriff to depute a person to serve any summons. Forbes v. Bringe, 32 Neb. 757, 49 N.W. 720 (1891).

Constables cannot appoint deputies. Gilbert and Artist v. Brown & Brother, 9 Neb. 90, 2 N.W. 376 (1879).